tests/вӑйӑ.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах вӑйӑ":
    вӑйӑ<n><nom> :  вӑйӑ 
    вӑйӑ<n><gen> :  вӑййӑн 
    вӑйӑ<n><dat> :  вӑййа 
    вӑйӑ<n><loc> :  вӑйӑра 
    вӑйӑ<n><abl> :  вӑйӑран 
    вӑйӑ<n><ins> :  вӑйӑпа 
    вӑйӑ<n><abe> :  вӑйӑсӑр 
    вӑйӑ<n><ben> :  вӑйӑшӑн
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><nom> :  вӑййӑм 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><gen> :  вӑййӑмӑн 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><dat> :  вӑййӑма 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><loc> :  вӑййӑмра 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><abl> :  вӑййӑмран 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><ins> :  вӑййӑмпа 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><abe> :  вӑййӑмсӑр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><ben> :  вӑййӑмшӑн
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><nom> :  вӑййу 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><gen> :  вӑййун 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><dat> :  вӑййуна 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><loc> :  вӑййунта 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><abl> :  вӑййунтан 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><ins> :  вӑййупа 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><abe> :  вӑййусӑр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><ben> :  вӑййушӑн
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><nom> :  вӑййи 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><gen> :  вӑййин 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><dat> :  вӑййине 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><loc> :  вӑййинче 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><abl> :  вӑййинчен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><ins> :  вӑййипе 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><abe> :  вӑййисӗр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><ben> :  вӑййишӗн
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><nom> :  вӑййӑмӑр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><gen> :  вӑййӑмӑрӑн 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><dat> :  вӑййӑмӑра 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><loc> :  вӑййӑмӑрта 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><abl> :  вӑййӑмӑртан 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><ins> :  вӑййӑмӑрпа 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><abe> :  вӑййӑмӑрсӑр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><ben> :  вӑййӑмӑршӑн
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><nom> :  вӑййӑр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><gen> :  вӑййӑрӑн 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><dat> :  вӑййӑра 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><loc> :  вӑййӑрта 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><abl> :  вӑййӑртан 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><ins> :  вӑййӑрпа 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><abe> :  вӑййӑрсӑр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><ben> :  вӑййӑршӑн
    вӑйӑ<n><pl><nom> :  вӑйӑсем 
    вӑйӑ<n><pl><gen> :  вӑйӑсен 
    вӑйӑ<n><pl><dat> :  вӑйӑсене 
    вӑйӑ<n><pl><loc> :  вӑйӑсенче 
    вӑйӑ<n><pl><abl> :  вӑйӑсенчен 
    вӑйӑ<n><pl><ins> :  вӑйӑсемпе 
    вӑйӑ<n><pl><abe> :  вӑйӑсемсӗр 
    вӑйӑ<n><pl><ben> :  вӑйӑсемшӗн
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  вӑййӑмсем 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  вӑййӑмсен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  вӑййӑмсене 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  вӑййӑмсенче 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  вӑййӑмсенчен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  вӑййӑмсемпе 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  вӑййӑмсемсӗр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  вӑййӑмсемшӗн
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  вӑййусем 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  вӑййусен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  вӑййусене 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  вӑййусенче 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  вӑййусенчен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  вӑййусемпе 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  вӑййусемсӗр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  вӑййусемшӗн
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  вӑййисем 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  вӑййисен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  вӑййисене 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  вӑййисенче 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  вӑййисенчен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  вӑййисемпе 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  вӑййисемсӗр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  вӑййисемшӗн
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  вӑййӑмӑрсем 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  вӑййӑмӑрсен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  вӑййӑмӑрсене 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  вӑййӑмӑрсенче 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  вӑййӑмӑрсенчен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  вӑййӑмӑрсемпе 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  вӑййӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  вӑййӑмӑрсемшӗн
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  вӑййӑрсем 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  вӑййӑрсен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  вӑййӑрсене 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  вӑййӑрсенче 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  вӑййӑрсенчен 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  вӑййӑрсемпе 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  вӑййӑрсемсӗр 
    вӑйӑ<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  вӑййӑрсемшӗн
